Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB731.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 6.601 TO 6.849 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A legislator or legislative agent shall not intentionally engage in sexual
harassment of any legislator, legislative agent, or employee of the legislative
branch of state government.
(2) Violation of subsection (1) of this section by a legislator or legislative agent is
ethical misconduct.
(3) As used in this section, "sexual harassment":
(a) Means any sexual advance, request for sexual favors, or other verbal or
physical conduct or communication of a sexual nature if:
1. Submission to the advances, requests, conduct, or communication is
an explicit or implicit term or condition of obtaining or retaining
employment;
2. Submission to or the rejection of advances, requests, conduct, or
communication affects decisions concerning a person's employment;
3. The conduct or communication has the purpose or the effect of:
a. Unreasonably interfering with the person's ability to perform his
or her job functions; or
b. Creating a hostile work environment; or
c. The conduct or communication is sexual harassment as defined
in:
i. KRS Chapter 344;
ii. Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964;
iii. State or federal case law;
iv. A policy or regulation enforced by the federal Equal
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1849
Employment Opportunity Commission; or
v. A policy or regulation enforced by the Kentucky
Commission on Human Rights;
(b) Includes but is not limited to the following conduct or communication:
1. Unwanted sexual contact or conduct of any kind, including sexual
flirtations, touching, advances, actions, propositions, intercourse, or
assault;
2. Unwelcome verbal communication of a sexual nature, including lewd
comments or innuendo, sexual jokes or references, or offensive
references;
3. Demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or sexually suggestive comments
or behavior directed at a person or in the presence of any person in a
public or private setting;
4. The display in the workplace of demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or
sexually suggestive objects, pictures, or photographs;
5. Demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or sexually suggestive written,
recorded, or electronically transmitted messages; or
6. Other conduct or communication not specifically described but which
is substantially similar to the conduct or communication described in
this subsection; and
(c) Includes a single incident described in this subsection if it is linked to an
employment benefit or is severe.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:17 PM Jacketed